Illinois, session 104th, SB3009.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for a grant to Neighborhood Housing Services of Chicago for 8costs associated with funding equitable mortgage lending and 9homebuyer subsidies, foreclosure prevention services, and 10other support.  11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122026.